pt-BR: Artigos esportivos > Atividades ao ar livre > Canoagem e esportes aquáticos > Surfe: Pranchas de bodyboarding; Pranchas de paddleboard; Pranchas de skimboarding; Leashes de prancha de surfe; Capas para prancha de surfe; Quilhas; Kits de reparo para pranchas de surf; Parafina; Pranchas de surfe; Botas de surf; Luvas para surfe; Capuzes de surf; Decks para pranchas de surfe
da: Sportsartikler > Friluftsliv > Sejling og vandsport > Surfing: Bodyboards; Padlebrætter; Skimboards; Surfbrætremme; Tasker til surfbrætter; Finner til surfbrætter; Reparationssæt til surfbrætter; Voks til surfbrætter; Surfbrætter; Surfsko; Surfhandsker; Surfhætter; Surfing – skridunderlag
sl-SI: Športna oprema > Rekreacija na prostem > Plovba in vodni športi > Surfanje: Deske za plovkanje; Deske za veslanje; Skimboard deske; Trakovi za surf deske; Kovčki in torbe za surf deske; Plavutke za surf deske; Komplet za popravilo desk za surfanje; Vosek za surf deske; Surf deske; Čevlji za surfanje; Rokavice za surfanje; Kapuce za surfanje; Repne blazinice za surfanje
fi: Urheilutarvikkeet > Ulkoharrasteet > Veneily ja vesiurheilu > Surffaus: Bodyboardit; SUP-laudat; Skimboardit; Surffiremmit; Surffilautojen kotelot ja pussit; Surffilaudan evät; Surffilaudan korjauspakkaukset; Surffivahat; Surffilaudat; Surffaustossut; Surffaushanskat; Surffaushuput; Grippipädit
sv: Sportartiklar > Utomhusaktiviteter > Båt- och vattensporter > Surfing: Bodyboards; Paddleboards; Skimboards; Fångremmar till surfingbrädor; Surfingbrädesfodral; Fenor till surfingbrädor; Reparationskit för surfbrädor; Vax till surfingbrädor; Surfingbrädor; Surfskor; Surfhandskar; Surfhuvor; Tailpads för surfing
it: Articoli sportivi > Ricreazione outdoor > Sport acquatici > Surf (sport): Bodyboard; Paddleboard; Skimboard; Lacci per tavole da surf; Custodie per tavole da surf; Alette per tavole da surf; Kit di riparazione per tavole da surf; Cera per tavole da surf; Tavole da surf; Calzari da surf; Guanti da surf; Cappucci da surf; Protezione posteriore tavola da surf
cs: Sportovní potřeby > Outdoorové aktivity > Lodě a vodní sporty > Surfování: Bodyboardy; Paddleboardy; Skimboardy; Šňůry k surfovým prknům; Obaly na surfová prkna; Ploutve k surfovým prknům; Sady na opravu surfů; Vosky na surfová prkna; Surfová prkna; Surfařské boty; Rukavice na surfing; Surfařské kukly; Ocasní podložky na surfová prkna
pt-PT: Artigos de desporto > Atividades recreativas no exterior > Desportos náuticos e aquáticos > Surfe: Pranchas de bodyboard; Pranchas de paddleboard; Pranchas de skimboard; Fitas para surfe; Sacos e estojos para pranchas de surfe; Quilhas para pranchas de surfe; Kits de reparação para pranchas de surf; Cera para pranchas de surfe; Pranchas de surfe; Botas de surf; Luvas para surfe; Capuzes de surf; Pads traseiros para surfe
ja: スポーツ用品 > 屋外レクリエーション > ウォータースポーツ・アクティビティ > サーフィン: ボディボード; パドルボード; スキムボード; サーフボード用リーシュコード; サーフボードケース; サーフボード用フィン; サーフボード修理キット; サーフボード用ワックス; サーフボード; サーフブーツ; サーフィン用グローブ; サーフィンフード; サーフィン用デッキパッド
hr-HR: Sportska oprema > Rekreacija na otvorenom > Plovidba i vodeni sportovi > Surfanje: Bodyboard daske; SUP daska; Skimboard daske; Konop za surfanje; Torbe za dasku za surfanje; Peraje za dasku za surfanje; Kompleti za popravak daske za surfanje; Vosak za dasku za surfanje; Daske za surfanje; Gležnjače za surfanje; Rukavice za surfanje; Kapuljače za surfanje; Jastučići za rep za surfanje
fr: Équipements sportifs > Loisirs de plein air > Plaisance et sports nautiques > Surf: Bodyboards; Paddleboards; Skimboards; Sangles pour planches de surf; Housses de planche de surf; Dérives pour planches de surf; Kits de réparation pour planches de surf; Cire pour planches de surf; Planches de surf; Chaussons de surf; Gants de surf; Cagoules de surf; Pads de surf
sk-SK: Športový tovar > Exteriérové rekreakčné športy > Člnkovanie a vodné športy > Surfovanie: Bodyboardy; Paddleboardy; Skimboardy; Popruhy na surfy; Puzdrá a tašky na surfovacie dosky; Plutvy na surfovacie dosky; Súpravy na opravu surfových dosiek; Vosk na surfovacie dosky; Surfovacie dosky; Surfovacie topánky; Rukavice na surfovanie; Surfovacie kapucne; Trakčné podložky na surf
nl: Sportartikelen > Buitenrecreatie > Boten en watersport > Surfen: Bodyboards; Paddleboards; Skimboards; Enkelbanden voor surfplanken; Surfplankhoezen; Skeggen voor surfplanken; Reparatiesets voor surfplanken; Surfplankwas; Surfplanken; Surfschoentjes; Surfhandschoenen; Surfkappen; Surfgrips
th: อุปกรณ์กีฬา > สันทนาการกลางแจ้ง > กีฬาทางเรือและทางน้ำ > การเล่นกระดานโต้คลื่น: บอดี้บอร์ด; แพดเดิลบอร์ด; สกิมบอร์ด; สายผูกข้อเท้ากับกระดานโต้คลื่น; ถุงและที่ใส่กระดานโต้คลื่น; ครีบของกระดานโต้คลื่น; ชุดเครื่องมือซ่อมกระดานโต้คลื่น; แวกซ์สำหรับกระดานโต้คลื่น; กระดานโต้คลื่น; รองเท้าโต้คลื่น; ถุงมือเล่นเซิร์ฟ; หมวกคลุมกันหนาวโต้คลื่น; แผ่นปิดส่วนท้ายของกระดานโต้คลื่น
zh-CN: 体育用品 > 户外休闲 > 划船/水上运动 > 冲浪用品: 冲浪趴板; 冲浪桨板/滑水板; 浅水冲浪板; 冲浪板脚绳; 冲浪板包; 冲浪板尾舵; 冲浪板维修套件; 冲浪板蜡; 冲浪板; 冲浪鞋; 冲浪手套; 冲浪头罩; 冲浪后垫
hu: Sportszerek > Szabadtéri kikapcsolódás > Csónakázás és vízi sportok > Szörfözés: Bodyszörfök; Paddleboardok; Skimboardok; Szörfpórázok; Szörfdeszkatokok és -táskák; Szörfdeszkauszonyok; Szörfdeszka-javító készletek; Szörfdeszkaviaszok; Szörfdeszkák; Szörfcipők; Szörfkesztyűk; Szörfcsuklyák; Szörf-farokpárnák
pl: Sprzęt sportowy > Rekreacja na świeżym powietrzu > Żegluga i sporty wodne > Surfing: Bodyboardy; Deski do paddleboardingu; Deski do skimboardingu; Smycze dla surferów; Pokrowce na deski surfingowe; Stateczniki do desek surfingowych; Zestawy naprawcze do desek surfingowych; Wosk do desek surfingowych; Deski surfingowe; Buty surfingowe; Rękawice surfingowe; Kaptury surfingowe; Nakładki na deski surfingowe
tr: Spor Malzemeleri > Açık Hava Etkinlikleri > Kayıkçılık ve Su Sporları > Sörf: Bodyboard Tahtaları; Paddleboard Tahtaları; Skimboard Tahtaları; Sörf Tahtası Kayışları; Sörf Tahtası Kutuları; Sörf Tahtası Yüzgeçleri; Sörf tahtası tamir kitleri; Sörf Tahtası Cilası; Sörf Tahtaları; Sörf patikleri; Sörf Eldivenleri; Sörf başlıkları; Sörf Tahtası Kuyruk Kısmı
vi: Dụng cụ thể thao > Giải trí ngoài trời > Chèo thuyền và thể thao dưới nước > Lướt sóng: Ván lướt sóng nằm sấp; Ván chèo đứng; Ván trượt trên nước; Dây thừng ván lướt; Hộp & túi đựng ván lướt sóng; Vây ván trượt; Bộ sửa chữa ván lướt sóng; Sáp ván lướt sóng; Ván lướt sóng; Giày lướt sóng; Găng tay lướt sóng; Mũ trùm lướt sóng; Miếng dán đuôi lướt sóng
lt-LT: Sporto prekės > Poilsis lauke > Plaukiojimas valtimis ir vandens sportas > Banglenčių sportas: Gulimosios banglentės; Irklentės; Pakrančių banglentės; Banglenčių dirželiai; Banglenčių dėklai ir krepšiai; Banglenčių kiliai; Banglenčių remonto rinkinys; Banglenčių vaškas; Banglentės; Banglenčių batai; Banglenčių pirštinės; Banglenčių gobtuvai; Banglenčių galinės plokštelės
bg-BG: Спортни стоки > Спортни занимания на открито > Плаване с лодка и водни спортове > Сърфиране: Бодибордове; Падъл бордове; Скимбордове; Каишки за сърф; Калъфи и чанти за дъски за сърф; Финки за дъска за сърф; Комплект за ремонт на дъски за сърф; Вакса за сърф; Дъски за сърф; Обувки за сърф; Ръкавици за сърфиране; Качулки за сърф; Подложки за опашка за сърф
es: Equipamiento deportivo > Actividades al aire libre > Deportes acuáticos y navegación deportiva > Surf: Bodyboards; Paddleboards; Skimboards; Correas para tablas de surf; Fundas para tablas de surf; Aletas para tablas de surf; Kits de reparación para tablas de surf; Cera para tablas de surf; Tablas de surf; Escarpines para surf; Guantes de surf; Capuchas para surf; Antideslizantes para tablas de surf
nb: Sportsutstyr > Friluftsliv > Båt og vannsport > Surfing: Bodyboards; Paddleboards; Skimboards; Surfeliner; Vesker og bagger for surfebrett; Surfebrettfinner; Reparasjonssett til surfebrett; Surfebrettvoks; Surfebrett; Surfesko; Surfehansker; Surfehetter; Trekkputer for surfing
ro-RO: Articole sportive > Recreere în aer liber > Plimbări cu barca și sporturi nautice > Surfing: Plăci bodyboard; Plăci cu padele; Plăci skimboard; Coarde de siguranță pentru surfing; Huse și genți pentru placa de surfing; Aripioare pentru placa de surfing; Kit de reparare pentru plăci de surfing; Ceară pentru placa de surfing; Plăci de surfing; Botoși de surfing; Mănuși pentru surfing; Glugă pentru surfing; Paduri pentru tracțiune pentru surfing
ru: Спортивные товары > Активный отдых на открытом воздухе > Гребля и водные виды спорта > Серфинг: Бодиборды; Паддлборды; Скимборды; Лиши для серфинга; Чехлы и сумки для досок для серфинга; Плавники для досок для серфинга; Ремкомплекты для серфбордов; Воск для досок для серфинга; Доски для серфинга; Гидрообувь для серфинга; Перчатки для серфинга; Гидрошлемы для серфинга; Коврики для досок для серфинга
en: Sporting Goods > Outdoor Recreation > Boating & Water Sports > Surfing: Bodyboards; Paddleboards; Skimboards; Surf Leashes; Surfboard Cases & Bags; Surfboard Fins; Surfboard Repair Kits; Surfboard Wax; Surfboards; Surfing Booties; Surfing Gloves; Surfing Hoods; Surfing Tail Pads
de: Sportartikel > Outdoor-Aktivitäten > Boot- & Wassersport > Surfen: Bodyboards; Paddelboards; Skimboards; Fußleinen für Surfbretter; Surfboard-Taschen; Surfbrettfinnen; Surfboard-Reparatursets; Surfboard-Wachs; Surfbretter; Surfschuhe; Handschuhe für Surfer; Surfhauben; Surfpads
el: Αθλητικά είδη > Υπαίθριες δραστηριότητες αναψυχής > Ναυσιπλοΐα & θαλάσσια σπορ > Σέρφινγκ: Bodyboards; Σανίδες με κουπί; Skimboards; Λουριά σανίδων σερφ; Θήκες και τσάντες για σανίδες σερφ; Πτερύγια σανίδων σερφ; Κιτ επισκευής σανίδων σερφ; Κερί σανίδων σερφ; Σανίδες σερφ; Παπουτσάκια σερφ; Γάντια σερφ; Κουκούλες σερφ; Πίσω προστατευτικά σερφ
zh-TW: 體育用品 > 室外休閒 > 水上運動 > 衝浪: 趴板用板; 槳板用板; 淺灘衝浪; 衝浪腳繩; 衝浪板保護殼/袋; 衝浪板舵; 衝浪板修補套組; 衝浪板蠟; 衝浪板; 衝浪防寒鞋; 衝浪手套; 衝浪頭罩; 衝浪板防滑墊
ko: 스포츠용품 > 야외 레크레이션 > 보트 놀이/수상 스포츠 > 서핑: 보디보드; 패들보드; 스킴보드; 서핑보드 리쉬; 서핑보드 케이스/가방; 서핑보드 핀; 서프보드 수리 키트; 서핑보드 왁스; 서핑보드; 서핑 부티; 서핑 장갑; 서핑 후드; 서핑보드 테일 패드